Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 5111.
Duties of the Director.

The Director shall:

provide general information to applicants for licensure as pollution abatement facility operators;

receive applications for licensure, administer or approve examinations and training programs, and provide licenses to applicants qualified under this chapter;

administer fees as established by law;

refer all disciplinary matters to an administrative law officer;

renew, revoke, and reinstate licenses as ordered by an administrative law officer; and

explain appeal procedures to licensed pollution abatement facility operators and to applicants, and complaint procedures to the public.

The Director shall adopt rules necessary to perform his or her duties under this section after due consultation with the Secretary of Natural Resources. These rules may establish grades, types, classes, or subcategories of licenses corresponding to facilities of distinct types and complexity.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 5112.
Advisor appointees.

The Secretary of State shall appoint three persons to be advisors to the Secretary, two of which shall be pollution abatement facility operators and one of which shall be a representative of the Agency of Natural Resources. Advisors shall be appointed for five-year staggered terms to serve at the Secretary’s pleasure as advisors in matters relating to operation. Two of the initial appointments may be for a term of fewer than five years.
(a) (1) The Secretary of State shall appoint three persons to be advisors to the Secretary, two of which shall be pollution abatement facility operators and one of which shall be a representative of the Agency of Natural Resources. Advisors shall be appointed for five-year staggered terms to serve at the Secretary’s pleasure as advisors in matters relating to operation. Two of the initial appointments may be for a term of fewer than five years.

A pollution abatement facility operator appointee shall have not fewer than five years’ experience as a pollution abatement facility operator immediately preceding appointment, shall be licensed as a pollution abatement facility operator in Vermont, and shall be actively engaged in the practice of pollution abatement facility operation in this State during incumbency.

An appointee representing the Agency of Natural Resources shall be involved in the administration of the permitting program established under

10 V.S.A. § 1263

.

The Director shall seek the advice of the advisor appointees in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.